Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 7. EARLY VOTING

SUBTITLE C. RESTRICTED BALLOT

CHAPTER 112. VOTING LIMITED BALLOT AFTER CHANGING COUNTY OF RESIDENCE

Sec. 112.001. LIMITED BALLOT. In this code, "limited ballot" means a ballot voted under this chapter that is restricted to the offices and propositions stating measures on which a person is entitled to vote under Section 112.004.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 112.002. ELIGIBILITY. (a) After changing residence to another county, a person is eligible to vote a limited ballot by personal appearance during the early voting period or by mail if:

(1) the person would have been eligible to vote in the county of former residence on election day if still residing in that county;

(2) the person is registered to vote in the county of former residence at the time the person:

(A) offers to vote in the county of new residence; or

(B) submitted a voter registration application in the county of new residence; and

(3) a voter registration for the person in the county of new residence is not effective on or before election day.

(b) A person is not eligible to vote a limited ballot by mail unless, in addition to satisfying the eligibility requirements prescribed by Subsection (a), the person is eligible for early voting by mail under Chapter 82.

(c) Before being accepted for voting under this chapter, the voter must execute a statement including:

(1) a statement that the voter satisfies the applicable requirements prescribed by Subsection (a);

(2) the voter's residence address or, if the residence has no address, the address at which the voter receives mail and a concise description of the voter's residence;

(3) the month, day, and year of the voter's birth; and

(4) the date the statement is executed.

(d) A statement executed under Subsection (c) shall be submitted:

(1) to an election officer at the main early voting polling place, if the person is voting by personal appearance; or

(2) with the person's application for a ballot to be voted by mail, if the person is voting by mail.

(e) A statement executed under Subsection (c) may include space for disclosure of any necessary information to enable the person to register to vote under Chapter 13.

(f) The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of a statement executed under Subsection (c).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1120 (H.B. 2454), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1235 (S.B. 1970), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 112.003. RESIDENCE IN PRECINCT SITUATED IN MORE THAN ONE COUNTY. A person who changes county of residence may vote in the regular manner in an election ordered by an authority of a political subdivision situated in more than one county if the person resides in the same election precinct both before and after changing county of residence and the person's voter registration in the county of former residence is effective at the time the person offers to vote.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 112.004. OFFICES AND MEASURES ON WHICH VOTER ENTITLED TO VOTE. A person voting a limited ballot is entitled to vote only on:

(1) each office and proposition stating a measure to be voted on statewide; and

(2) each office and proposition stating a measure to be voted on in a territorial unit of which the person was a resident both before changing county of residence and after the change.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 112.005. SUBMITTING APPLICATION FOR MAIL BALLOT. An application for a limited ballot to be voted by mail must be submitted to the early voting clerk serving the election precinct in which the applicant resides.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 112.006. PLACE FOR VOTING BY PERSONAL APPEARANCE. A person may vote a limited ballot by personal appearance only at the main early voting polling place.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1350, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 112.007. VERIFYING REGISTRATION STATUS OF APPLICANT FOR BALLOT. Before accepting an applicant to vote a limited ballot or, in the case of an application for a limited ballot to be voted by mail, before providing a ballot to the applicant, the early voting clerk shall verify, if possible, that the applicant does not have an effective voter registration in the county of new residence. If the person has applied in the county of new residence for a voter registration that will be effective on or before election day, the limited ballot application shall be rejected.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 112.008. DETERMINING OFFICES AND MEASURES TO BE VOTED ON. For each person who is to vote a limited ballot, the early voting clerk shall determine the offices and propositions stating measures on which the person is entitled to vote and shall indicate them on the person's application.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 112.009. PREPARING VOTING MACHINE. Before permitting a person to vote a limited ballot on a voting machine, the early voting clerk shall adjust the machine so that votes may be cast only on the offices and propositions stating measures on which the voter is entitled to vote.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 112.010. SUBSTITUTING MAIL BALLOTS FOR VOTING MACHINE. (a) If early voting by personal appearance is conducted by voting machine, the early voting clerk may conduct the personal appearance voting of limited ballots by using official ballots for early voting by mail.

(b) The secretary of state may provide for the use of envelopes or other containers instead of ballot boxes for voters to deposit ballots voted under this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 112.011. INFORMATION ON DISTRICT COMPOSITION. (a) In each even-numbered year, the secretary of state shall prepare information on the territorial composition of each district for which an officer of the state government is regularly elected at the general election for state and county officers.

(b) The information must include the data necessary to enable an early voting clerk to determine the district offices on which a voter under this chapter is eligible to vote.

(c) The secretary shall deliver the information to each county clerk before the 20th day before general primary election day.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 112.012. NOTIFICATION TO VOTER REGISTRAR. Not later than the 30th day after receipt of an application for a limited ballot, the early voting clerk shall notify the voter registrar for the voter's former county of residence that the voter has applied for a limited ballot.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 436, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.